Utah statutes.
32B-8-503.   Enforcement of Nuisance Retail Licensee Act.

Chapter 3, Part 3, Nuisance Retail Licensee Act, applies to a resort license only if three or more of the sublicenses of the resort license have not been renewed in accordance with Chapter 3, Part 3, Nuisance Retail Licensee Act, within three years from the day on which a resort licensee applies for the renewal of its resort license.

